Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2576SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 516 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ WORKING GROUP ââ 1 IMPACT OF TECHNOLOGY ON COGNITIVE LEARNING. 2 1. The department of education, in collaboration with the 3 department of health and human services, shall convene and 4 provide administrative support to a working group that shall 5 examine research related to the impact of school-provided 6 technology on the cognitive function and academic performance 7 of students. For purposes of this section, âschool-provided 8 technologyâ includes laptop computers, online learning 9 management systems, and classroom slide show presentations. 10 2. The membership of the working group shall include but 11 not be limited to educators, mental health professionals, and 12 parents of school-age children. 13 3. Any expenses incurred by a member of the working group 14 shall be the responsibility of the individual member or the 15 respective entity represented by the member. 16 4. The working group shall submit its findings and 17 recommendations in a report to the general assembly by December 18 31, 2025. The report shall include recommendations on best 19 practices related to the use of school-provided technology in 20 educational contexts with a focus on ways to mitigate possible 21 negative impacts on the social and behavioral development, 22 attention span, mental concentration, and learning ability of 23 students. 24